Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4201
Act, how cited.

Sections
44-4201 to 44-4235 shall be known and may be cited as the Comprehensive Health
Insurance Pool Act.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 20;

Laws 2001, LB 360, § 20;

Laws 2004, LB 1047, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB358, § 1.